Massachusetts, session 194th, H4204.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 195 of the Acts of 2022, an Act Providing for the Election of At-
large and District Councilors and School Committee Members in the City of Haverhill, is hereby
amended by inserting the following new paragraph at the end of section 2:- No person shall
simultaneously hold the office of Mayor, City Councilor or School Committee member while
holding another elected or appointed office of the City or holding a position with the city for
which the salary or compensation is payable out of the city treasury. These provisions shall not
apply to any City Councilor serving as acting Mayor.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon its passage and be applicable to city
elections beginning with the 2025 biennial municipal election.
of 1